Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 3. Management of the Common Interest Community
§ 3-108.
Meetings.

The following requirements apply to unit owner meetings:

An association shall hold a meeting of unit owners annually at a time, date, and place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

An association shall hold a special meeting of unit owners to address any matter affecting the common interest community or the association if its president, a majority of the executive board, or unit owners having at least 20 percent, or any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the association request that the secretary call the meeting. If the association does not notify unit owners of a special meeting within 30 days after the requisite number or percentage of unit owners request the secretary to do so, the requesting members may directly notify all the unit owners of the meeting. Only matters described in the meeting notice required by subdivision (3) of this subsection may be considered at a special meeting.

An association shall notify unit owners of the time, date, and place of each annual and special unit owners meeting not less than 10 days or more than 60 days before the meeting date. Notice may be by any means described in section 3-121 of this title. The notice of any meeting must state the time, date, and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including:

a statement of the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws;

any budget changes; and

any proposal to remove an officer or member of the executive board.

The minimum time to give notice required by subdivision (3) of this subsection may be reduced or waived for a meeting called to deal with an emergency.

Unit owners shall be given a reasonable opportunity at any meeting to comment regarding any matter affecting the common interest community or the association.

The declaration or bylaws may allow for meetings of unit owners to be conducted by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process, if the alternative process is consistent with subdivision (b)(7) of this section.

The following requirements apply to meetings of the executive board and committees of the association authorized to act for the association:

Meetings shall be open to the unit owners except during executive sessions. The executive board and those committees may hold an executive session only during a regular or special meeting of the board or a committee. No final vote or action may be taken during an executive session. An executive session may be held only to:

consult with the association’s attorney concerning legal matters;

discuss existing or potential litigation or mediation, arbitration, or administrative proceedings;

discuss labor or personnel matters;

discuss contracts, leases, and other commercial transactions to purchase or provide goods or services currently being negotiated, including the review of bids or proposals, if premature general knowledge of those matters would place the association at a disadvantage; or

prevent public knowledge of the matter to be discussed if the executive board or committee determines that public knowledge would violate the privacy of any person.

For purposes of this section, a gathering of board members at which the board members do not conduct association business is not a meeting of the executive board. The executive board and its members may not use incidental or social gatherings of board members or any other method to evade the open meeting requirements of this section.

During the period of declarant control, the executive board shall meet at least four times a year. At least one of those meetings must be held at the common interest community or at a place convenient to the community. After termination of the period of declarant control, all executive board meetings shall be at the common interest community or at a place convenient to the community unless the unit owners amend the bylaws to vary the location of those meetings.

At each executive board meeting, the executive board shall provide a reasonable opportunity for unit owners to comment regarding any matter affecting the common interest community and the association.

Unless the meeting is included in a schedule given to the unit owners or the meeting is called to deal with an emergency, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall give notice of each executive board meeting to each board member and to the unit owners. The notice shall be given at least 10 days before the meeting and shall state the time, date, place, and agenda of the meeting.

If any materials are distributed to the executive board before the meeting, the executive board at the same time shall make copies of those materials reasonably available to unit owners, except:

the board need not make available copies of unapproved minutes or materials that are to be considered in executive session; and

the board of an association composed exclusively of time-share unit owners shall be required to make reasonably available to the unit owners only those materials concerning matters on which action will be taken at the meeting.

Unless the declaration or bylaws otherwise provide, the executive board may meet by telephonic, video, or other conferencing process if:

the meeting notice states the conferencing process to be used and provides information explaining how unit owners may participate in the conference directly or by meeting at a central location or conference connection; and

the process provides all unit owners the opportunity to hear or perceive the discussion and to comment as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection.

After termination of the period of declarant control, unit owners may amend the bylaws to vary the procedures for meetings described in subdivision (7) of this subsection.

Instead of meeting, the executive board may act by unanimous consent as documented in a record authenticated by all its members. The secretary promptly shall give notice to all unit owners of any action taken by unanimous consent. After termination of the period of declarant control, the executive board may act by unanimous consent only to undertake ministerial actions or to implement actions previously taken at a meeting of the executive board.

Even if an action by the executive board is not in compliance with this section, it is valid unless set aside by a court. A challenge to the validity of an action of the executive board for failure to comply with this section may not be brought more than 60 days after the minutes of the executive board of the meeting at which the action was taken are approved or the record of that action is distributed to unit owners, whichever is later.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. Jan. 1, 2012;

2013, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3-109.
Quorum.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the unit owners if persons entitled to cast 20 percent of the votes in the association:

are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting;

have cast absentee ballots solicited in accordance with subdivision 3-110(c)(4) of this title which have been delivered to the secretary in a timely manner; or

are present by any combination of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger number, a quorum of the executive board is present for purposes of determining the validity of any action taken at a meeting of the executive board only if individuals entitled to cast 50 percent of the votes on that board are present at the time a vote regarding that action is taken. If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of the board members present is the act of the executive board unless a greater vote is required by the declaration or bylaws.

Except as otherwise provided in the bylaws, meetings of the association shall be conducted in accordance with the most recent edition of Roberts’ Rules of Order Newly Revised.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-110.
Voting; proxies; ballots.

Unless prohibited or limited by the declaration or bylaws, unit owners may vote at a meeting in person, by absentee ballot pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this section, by a proxy pursuant to subsection (c) of this section or, when a vote is conducted without a meeting, by electronic or paper ballot pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

At a meeting of unit owners, the following requirements apply:

Unit owners who are present in person may vote by voice vote, show of hands, standing, or any other method for determining the votes of unit owners, as designated by the person presiding at the meeting.

If only one of multiple owners of a unit is present, that owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one of the owners are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one of the owners casts the votes allocated to the unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

Unless a greater number or fraction of the votes in the association is required by this chapter or the declaration, a majority of the votes cast determines the outcome of any action of the association.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, a unit owner may vote by absentee ballot without being present at the meeting. The association promptly shall deliver an absentee ballot to an owner that requests it if the request is made at least three days before the scheduled meeting. Votes cast by absentee ballot must be included in the tally of a vote taken at that meeting.

When a unit owner votes by absentee ballot, the association must be able to verify that the ballot is cast by the unit owner having the right to do so.

Except as otherwise provided in the declaration or bylaws, the following requirements apply with respect to proxy voting:

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to a directed or undirected proxy duly executed by a unit owner.

If a unit is owned by more than one person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy.

A unit owner may revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section only by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association.

A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice.

A proxy is valid only for the meeting at which it is cast and any recessed session of that meeting.

A person may not cast undirected proxies representing more than 15 percent of the votes in the association.

Unless prohibited or limited by the declaration or bylaws, an association may conduct a vote without a meeting. In that event, the following requirements apply:

The association shall notify the unit owners that the vote will be taken by ballot.

The association shall deliver a paper or electronic ballot to every unit owner entitled to vote on the matter.

The ballot must set forth each proposed action and provide an opportunity to vote for or against the action.

When the association delivers the ballots, it shall also:

indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

state the percent of votes necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors;

specify the time and date by which a ballot must be delivered to the association to be counted, which time and date may not be fewer than three days after the date the association delivers the ballot; and

describe the time, date, and manner by which a unit owner wishing to deliver information to all unit owners regarding the subject of the vote may do so.

Except as otherwise provided in the declaration or bylaws, a ballot is not revoked after delivery to the association by death or disability or attempted revocation by the person that cast that vote.

Approval by ballot pursuant to this subsection is valid only if the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the common interest community be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units:

this section applies to lessees as if they were unit owners;

unit owners that have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and

lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners.

Unit owners must also be given notice of all meetings at which lessees are entitled to vote.

Votes allocated to a unit owned by the association shall be cast in any vote of the unit owners in the same proportion as the votes cast on the matter by unit owners other than the association.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-111.
Tort and contract liability.

A unit owner is not liable, solely by reason of being a unit owner, for any injury or damage arising out of the condition or use of the common elements. Neither the association nor any unit owner except the declarant is liable for that declarant’s torts in connection with any part of the common interest community which the declarant has the responsibility to maintain.

An action alleging a wrong done by the association, including an action arising out of the condition or use of the common elements, must be brought only against the association and not against any unit owner. If the wrong occurred during any period of declarant control and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association is liable to the association or to any unit owner for:
(b) (1) An action alleging a wrong done by the association, including an action arising out of the condition or use of the common elements, must be brought only against the association and not against any unit owner. If the wrong occurred during any period of declarant control and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association is liable to the association or to any unit owner for:

all tort losses not covered by insurance, suffered by the association or that unit owner; and

all costs which the association would not have incurred but for a breach of contract or other wrongful act or omission.

Whenever the declarant is liable to the association under this title, the declarant is also liable for all litigation expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred by the association.

Except as provided in section 4-116 of this title with respect to warranty claims, any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action under this title does not begin to run until the period of declarant control terminates. A unit owner is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because he or she is a unit owner or a member or officer of the association. Liens resulting from judgments against the association are governed by section 3-114 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section provides that any action in tort or contract arising out of acts or omissions of the association shall be brought against the association and not against the individual unit owners. This changes the law in States where plaintiffs are forced to name individual unit owners as the real parties in interest to any action brought against the association. The subsection also provides that a unit owner is not precluded from bringing an action in tort or contract against the association solely because he is a unit owner or a member or officer of the association.

In recognition of the practical control that can (and in most cases will) be exercised by a declarant over the affairs of the association during any period of declarant control permitted pursuant to Section 3-103, subsection (a) provides that the association or any unit owner has a right of action against the declarant for any losses (including both payment of damages and attorneys’ fees) suffered by the association or any unit owner as a result of an action based upon a tort or breach of contract arising during any period of declarant control. To assure that the decision to bring such an action can be made by an executive board free from the influence of the declarant, the subsection also provides that any statute of limitations affecting such a right of action by the association shall be tolled until the expiration of any period of declarant control.

If a suit based on a claim which accrued during the period of developer control is brought against the association after control of the association has passed from the developer, reasonable notice to, and grant of an opportunity to the developer to defend, are conditions to developer liability. If, however, suit is brought against the association while the developer is still in control, obviously the developer cannot later resist a suit by the association for reimbursement on the grounds of failure to notify.

This draft makes clear what the drafters of the Uniform Condominium Act and the first version of this Act intended: that the form in which common elements are owned—whether in a condominium, planned community or cooperative—should not impose joint and several personal liability on condominium owners, when no such liability exists for owners in planned communities. Thus, the 1994 amendment to Section 3-111(a) rejects the decision in Ruoff v. Harbor Creek Community Association, 10 Cal.App.4th 1624, 13 Cal. Rptr 2d 755 (Cal.App. 1992). Rather, the result under both this section and Section 3-117—which imposes liability on unit owners for unsatisfied judgments against the association in proportion to their common expense liabilities—is consistent with the decision in Dutcher v. Owens, 647 S.W.2d 948 (Texas 1983).

The 1994 amendment to new subsection (b) of this section makes clear that no period of limitation regarding an association’s claim against the declarant, including a limit appearing in this or any other section of this Act, begins to run against the association until the period of declarant control terminates. This would include warranty claims for common elements arising under Section 4-116, unless a declarant elects to permit an independent unit owner review as described in that section. See Section 4-116(d) and Comments.

Thus, for example, the six-year—or two-year—limitation period within which a claim for breach of warranty must be brought under Section 4-116(a) would not commence until the earlier of either: (a) the date on which the period of declarant control terminates by operation of law (see Sections 3-103(d) and 3-111(b)), or the date the declarant empowers an independent executive board committee to evaluate and enforce warranty claims.
(See Section 4-116(d).)

§ 3-112.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

Portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subject to a security interest by the association, if persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including 80 percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage specified in the declaration, agree to that action; but all owners of units to which any limited common element is allocated must agree in order to convey that limited common element or be subjected to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association; but the proceeds of the sale of limited common elements shall be distributed equitably among the owners of units to which the limited common elements were allocated.

An agreement to convey common elements or subject them to a security interest shall be evidenced by an agreement executed or ratified in the same manner as a deed by the requisite number of unit owners. The agreement shall specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded. The agreement and all ratifications shall be recorded in every town in which a portion of the common interest community is situated and is effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract to convey an interest in a common interest community pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Unless made pursuant to this section, any purported conveyance or encumbrance, judicial sale or other voluntary transfer of common elements is void.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if the holders of first security interests on 80 percent of the units that are subject to security interests on the day the unit owners’ agreement under subsection (c) of this section is recorded consent in writing:

a conveyance of common elements pursuant to this section terminates both the undivided interests in those common elements allocated to the units and the security interests in those undivided interests held by all persons holding security interests in the units; and

an encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section has priority over all preexisting encumbrances on the undivided interests in those common elements held by all persons holding security interests in the units.

The consents by holders of first security interests on units described in subsection (e) of this section, or a certificate of the secretary affirming that those consents have been received by the association, may be recorded at any time before the date on which the agreement under subsection (c) of this title becomes void. Consents or certificates so recorded are valid from the date they are recorded for purposes of calculating the percentage of consenting first security interest holders, regardless of later sales or encumbrances on those units. Even if the required percentage of first security interest holders so consents, a conveyance or encumbrance of common elements does not affect interests having priority over the declaration, or created by the association after the declaration was recorded.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) provides that a condominium or planned community association may sell or encumber portions of the common elements and subsection (b) provides that a cooperative association may sell part, or encumber all, of the cooperative. The difference in treatment of condominiums and planned communities, on the one hand, and cooperatives, on the other, arises out of the fact that in a cooperative title to the entire cooperative is in the association. Also, historically, cooperative associations have had greater control over the regime real estate, including the units, than has been the case in condominiums or planned communities.

Subsection (c) requires that the agreement for sale or encumbrance be evidenced by the execution of an agreement in the same manner as a deed by the requisite majority of the unit owners. The agreement then must be recorded in the land records. The recorded agreement signed by the unit owners is not the conveyance itself, but is rather a supporting document which shows that the association has full power to execute a deed or mortgage. Under subsection (d) it is contemplated that the association will execute the actual instrument of conveyance. Under subsection (f), a conveyance or encumbrance under this section may not deprive a unit owner of rights of access and support.

As originally written, subsection (g) was intended to cut off the interests of unit lenders whose lien extended to the owner’s undivided interest, in the case of a condominium, or beneficial interest, in the case of a cooperative or planned community, in the common elements. The 1994 revision simply clarifies this intent, and states precisely the procedure needed to accomplish the desired result.

The introductory clause, “unless the declaration otherwise provides,” contemplates the possibility that the declarant or his construction lender may desire to completely prohibit the conveyance or encumbrance of common elements, may require unanimous consent of first mortgagees, or may require another outcome which varies the result of the default rule of this section. Nonetheless, the drafters believe that the default rule strikes an appropriate balance between the interests of security holders and the interests of the association. A rule which requires the consent of every holder of every interest in every unit in a common interest community imposes unreasonable transaction costs for an otherwise rational economic transaction.

The effect of foreclosure of security interests granted pursuant to this section is governed by Section 2-118 (Termination).

The power given by subsections (a) and (b) can be exercised only on agreement of unit owners holding 80% of the votes in the association (80% is the percentage required for termination of a common interest community under Section 2-118).
This power may be exercised during the period of declarant control, but, in order to be effective, 80% of non-declarant unit owners must approve the action.
The ability, without termination, to sell common elements in a condominium or planned community or to sell part of a cooperative gives common interest communities desirable flexibility.
For example, the unit owners, some years after the initial creation of the common interest community may decide to convey away a portion of the open space which has been reserved as a part of the common elements because they no longer find the area useful or because they wish to use sale proceeds to make other improvements.
Similarly, the ability to encumber real estate in the common interest community gives the association power to raise money for improvements through the device of mortgaging the improvements themselves.
Of course, recreational improvements will frequently not be sufficient security for a loan for their construction. Nevertheless, the ability to take a security interest in such improvements may lead lenders to be more favorably disposed toward making a loan in larger amounts and at lower interest rates.

To the extent that a lien on a unit (whether in the nature of a security interest, tax lien, attachment, or construction lien) also reaches the owner’s interest in the common elements, this amendment makes clear that a proper vote of unit owners and first mortgage holders cuts off that lien.

This section does not affect the interests of persons who hold a direct lien on the common elements nor does it affect the priority or validity of any interest with respect to the unit itself.

On the other hand, the association ought not be able to dispose of its assets automatically and in all cases to the detriment of persons who have made loans to unit owners in reliance on the value of the common elements, without the consent of those persons.
Thus, a default rule requiring the consent of a super-majority of first mortgagees should ensure that in the usual case, the interests of all lenders will be adequately protected without unduly restricting the needs of the association.

§ 3-113.
Insurance.

After no later than the date of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, to the extent reasonably available and subject to reasonable deductibles, the association shall maintain the following insurance coverage:

Property insurance on the common elements and, in a planned community, also on property which will become common elements, to insure against risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against, which insurance, after application of any deductibles, shall be not less than 80 percent of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of items normally excluded from property policies.

Commercial general liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the executive board but not less than any amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for bodily injury or property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements.

Fidelity insurance.

In the case of a building which contains units divided by horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, or vertical boundaries that comprise common walls between units, to the extent reasonably available, the insurance maintained under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall include the units but need not include improvements and betterments installed by unit owners.

If insurance described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section is not reasonably available, the association shall promptly so notify all unit owners by United States mail or hand delivery. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall provide all the following:

Liability coverage for each unit owner arising out of his or her interest in the common elements or membership in the association.

Waiver by the insurer of its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner or member of the owner’s household.

That no act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of his or her authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy.

Primary coverage by the association policy in the event other insurance in the name of the unit owner is in effect to cover the same risk.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b) of this section shall be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to a holder of a security interest. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold insurance proceeds in trust for the association, unit owners and lien holders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this section, the proceeds shall be spent first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property. The association, unit owners, and lienholders are not entitled to payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus after the property has been completely repaired or restored or the common interest community is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from insuring for his or her own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any unit owner or holder of a security interest. All insurance notices shall be mailed to the association, each unit owner, and each holder of a security interest to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued at their respective last known addresses.

Any portion of the common interest community for which insurance is required under this section which is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless:
(h) (1) Any portion of the common interest community for which insurance is required under this section which is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless:

the common interest community is terminated, in which case section 2-118 of this title shall apply;

the repair or replacement is illegal under state or municipal law; or

80 percent or more of the unit owners, including the affected owners of units or units allocated limited common elements vote not to rebuild. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense.

If the entire common interest community is not repaired or replaced:

the insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the common interest community; and

except to the extent that other persons will be distributees:

the insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements which are not rebuilt must be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear in proportion to the common expense liabilities of all the units; and

the remainder of the proceeds shall be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common expense liabilities of those units.

If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon the vote, and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a common interest community in which all units are restricted to nonresidential use.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-114.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, any surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provision for common expenses and any prepayment of reserves shall be paid annually to the unit owners in proportion to their common expense liabilities or credited to them to reduce their future common expense assessments.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-115.
Assessments for common expenses.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments shall be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least annually by the association.

Except for assessments under subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section, or as otherwise provided in this title, all common expenses shall be assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration. The association may charge interest on any past due assessment or portion thereof at a rate established by the association, not exceeding the legal rate.

To the extent required by the declaration:

a common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element shall be assessed against the units to which that limited common element is assigned, equally or in any other proportion the declaration provides;

a common expense benefiting fewer than all of the units or their owners may be assessed exclusively against the units or unit owners benefited; and

the cost of insurance shall be assessed in proportion to risk and the cost of utilities shall be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association may be assessed only against the units in the common interest community at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If damage to a unit or other part of the common interest community, or if any other common expense is caused by the willful misconduct or gross negligence of any unit owner, guest, or invitee of a unit owner, the association may, after notice and hearing, assess that expense exclusively against that owner’s unit, even if the association maintains insurance with respect to that damage or common expense.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.